Utah statutes.
73-10-18.   Division of Water Resources -- Creation -- Power and authority.
There is created the Division of Water Resources, which shall be within the
Department of Natural Resources under the administration and general
supervision of the executive director of natural resources and under the
policy direction of the Board of Water Resources. The Division of Water
Resources shall be the water resource(s) authority for the state of Utah,
shall assume all of the functions, powers, duties, rights and responsibilities
of the Utah water and power board except those which are delegated to the
board by this act and is vested with such other functions, powers, duties,
rights and responsibilities as provided in this act and other law.
